Illinois, session 104th, HB3994.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $46,999,828, or so much thereof 5as may be necessary, is appropriated to the Illinois Power 6Agency from the Illinois Power Agency Operations Fund for its 7current and prior year ordinary and contingent expenses, as 8well as for refunds. 9    Section 10. The sum of $4,000,000, or so much thereof as 10may be necessary, is appropriated to the Illinois Power Agency 11from the Illinois Power Agency Operations Fund for its 12ordinary and contingent expenses pursuant to the Energy 13Transition Act. 14    Section 15. The amount of $56,000,000 or so much thereof 15as may be necessary, is appropriated to the Illinois Power 16Agency from the Illinois Power Agency Renewable Energy 17Resources Fund for funding of current and prior fiscal year 18purchases of renewable energy resources and related expenses, 19including the refund of bidder deposit fees, refund of 20overpayments of alternative compliance payments, and expenses 21related to the development and administration of the Illinois 22Solar for All Program, pursuant to subsections (b), (c), and   HB3994- 2 -LRB104 12501 AAS 22896 b1(i) of Section 1-56 of the Illinois Power Agency Act. 2    Section 20. The amount of $12,000,000, or so much thereof 3as may be necessary, is appropriated to the Illinois Power 4Agency from the Illinois Power Agency Trust Fund for deposit 5into the Illinois Power Agency Operations Fund pursuant to 6subsection (c) of Section 6z-75 of the State Finance Act. 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 82025.